Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer
and Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Workers’ Compensation
Board ........................................ $ 24,734,955
(2) Workers’ Compensation
Division..................................... $ 43,130,865
(3) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 42,665,924
(4) Central Services Division .......... $ 40,413,675
(5) Division of Financial
Regulation................................. $ 46,213,993
(6) Building Codes Division ............ $ 36,125,080
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses by the Department of Consumer and Business  Services from the Health Insur-
ance Exchange Fund established by ORS 741.102 for the following purposes:
(1) Marketplace Division ................ $ 14,917,407
(2) Central Services Division .......... $ 1,012,108
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, $1,383,290 is estab-
lished for  the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment of ex-
penses for  the COFA Premium Assistance Program from the COFA Premium Assistance
Program Fund established by section 5, chapter 94, Oregon Laws 2016.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services for the following purposes:
(1) Oregon OSHA ............................ $ 12,990,316
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 1
(2) Senior Health Insurance
Benefit Assistance Program ..... $ 1,400,186
(3) Central Services Division .......... $ 297,182
(4) Building Codes Division ............ $ 253,610
SECTION 5. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, the following  expenditures by the
Department of Consumer and Business Services are not limited:
(1) Expenditures from the Workers’ Benefit Fund;
(2) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Adjustment Reserve;
(3) Expenditures from the Self-Insured Employer Group Adjustment Reserve;
(4) Expenditures from the  Consumer and Business Services Fund for payment of con-
tracted collection costs, including contracted processing costs for the Combined Payroll Tax
Reporting Program, contracted building codes permit issuance costs and workers’  compen-
sation paying agent reimbursements as described in ORS 656.307;
(5) Expenditures from the Funeral and Cemetery Consumer Protection Trust Fund; and
(6) Special payments to Oregon Health and Science University for  research on occupa-
tional illness and disease.
SECTION 6.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by Senate May 17, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 1, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5512 (SB 5512-A) Page 2